Arkansas, session 2025, HB1462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A citizen of this state may receive potable water through a
lead service line;
(2) Lead may detach from a lead service line and contaminate
water that moves through the lead service line;
(3) Lead exposure may cause:
(A) Organ damage, including without limitation brain
damage, kidney damage, heart damage, and lung damage;
(B) Diminution in bone mass and muscle growth;
(C) Poor muscle coordination;
*SSS080*
02/12/2025 10:18:18 AM SSS080

HB1462
(D) High blood pressure;
(E) Reproductive health complications;
(F) Miscarriage;
(G) Premature birth; and
(H) Low birth weight;
(4) Local water providers are required to replace lead service
lines under 40 C.F.R. pts. 141 and 142, as they existed on October 30, 2024;
and
(5) Replacement of lead service lines and other facilities under
40 C.F.R. pts. 141 and 142, as they existed on October 30, 2024, constitutes
a public purpose to which water utility rate revenue and other public moneys,
revenues, bond proceeds, and funds may be devoted.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 234, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
§ 14-234-123. Replacement of lead service lines —— Issuance of bonds
—— Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Lead service line" means a water service line that is
constructed of:
(A) Lead, at least in part; or
(B) Galvanized steel and exists or previously existed
downstream of a service line or other conduit constructed of lead material or
unknown material;
(2) "Person" means:
(A) A public or private corporation;
(B) An individual;
(C) A partnership;
(D) An association; or
(E) Other entity;
(3) "Public entity" means:
(A) A municipality;
(B) A consolidated waterworks system as defined in § 25-
20-307;
(C) A water authority as defined in § 4-35-103;
(D) A public facilities board as defined in § 14-137-103;
02/12/2025 10:18:18 AM SSS080

HB1462
(E) A water district as defined in § 14-116-103;
(F) An improvement district as defined in § 14-89-801; or
(G) Other political subdivision of the state; and
(4) "Water provider" means a public entity that owns a
waterworks system.
(b) A water provider may replace a lead service line located on
private property if the water provider:
(1) Obtains the consent of the owner of the private property
where the lead service line is located; and
(2) Complies with local regulations and policies that govern the
water provider.
(c) A water provider may:
(1) Spend water utility rate revenue and other public moneys,
revenues, and funds on the replacement of a lead service line of a customer
that the water provider serves; and
(2) Use existing statutory authority that permits the water
provider to issue bonds for waterworks system improvements to:
(A) Issue bonds; and
(B) Use the proceeds to replace a lead service line of a
customer that the water provider serves.
(d) A water provider replacing a lead service line that another person
owns does not confer ownership or maintenance responsibilities for the
replaced lead service line on the water provider unless the water provider
and other person otherwise agree.












02/12/2025 10:18:18 AM SSS080